Hawaii, session 2025, HB777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 205-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d) Special permits for land the area of which is greater than fifteen acres or for lands designated as important agricultural lands shall be subject to approval by the land use commission.  The land use commission may impose additional restrictions as may be necessary or appropriate in granting the approval, including the adherence to representations made by the applicant.  The land use commission may designate another agency, including but not limited to the office of planning and sustainable development, department of agriculture, or agribusiness development corporation, to monitor compliance with any restrictions imposed in the permit." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________